Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIII Administration of Trusts and Estates of Persons Under Disability
CHAPTER 388 Uniform Veterans’ Guardianship Act

388.010.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

388.020.
Appointment of guardian or committee. [Repealed.]

388.030.
Guardian or committee may not act for more than five wards — Exceptions. [Repealed.]

388.040.
Petition for appointment of committee. [Repealed.]

388.050.
Certificate is evidence of necessity for guardian. [Repealed.]

388.060.
Statement for appointment of committee. [Repealed.]

388.070.
Notice of petition. [Repealed.]

388.080.
Court to approve guardian or committee, bond. [Repealed.]

388.090.
Annual accounting with court — Certified copy to bureau — Notice and hearing. [Repealed.]

388.100.
Failure to file account — Removal for. [Repealed.]

388.110.
Compensation of guardian or committee. [Repealed.]

388.120.
Investment of ward’s funds. [Repealed.]

388.130.
Use of ward’s estate for support of others. [Repealed.]

388.140.
Copy of public records to be furnished bureau. [Repealed.]

388.150.
Commitment of veteran to U.S. Veterans’ Hospital. [Repealed.]

388.160.
Discharge of guardian or committee on majority or competency of ward. [Repealed.]

388.170.
Construction of chapter. [Repealed.]

388.180.
Title of chapter. [Repealed.]

388.190.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

The term “person” includes a partnership, corporation or an association.

The term “Veterans Affairs” means the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, its predecessors or successors.

The terms “estate” and “income” shall include only moneys received by the guardian or conservator from the Veterans Affairs, all earnings, interest and profits derived therefrom and all property acquired therewith.

The term “benefits” shall mean all moneys paid or payable by the United States through the Veterans Affairs.

The term “administrator” means the administrator of veterans affairs or his successor.

The term “ward” means a beneficiary of the Veterans Affairs.

The term “guardian” as used herein shall mean any person acting as a fiduciary for a person adjudged mentally disabled.

The term “court” means the District Court of the county of the beneficiary’s residence.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 25, § 1; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 347, effective January 2, 1978; 1982, ch. 141, § 115, effective July 1, 1982; 2017 ch. 42, § 20, effective June 29, 2017.

388.200.
Administrator of veterans affairs is necessary party to proceedings relating to estate of beneficiary — Notice.

The administrator of veterans affairs, or his successor, is and shall be a party in interest in any proceeding brought under any law of this state for the appointment of a guardian or conservator for any beneficiary, who is a minor or who has been adjudged mentally disabled, or the Veterans Affairs on whose account benefits have been paid or are payable by said Veterans Affairs, and the said administrator or his successor is and shall be an interested party in any court proceeding pertaining to or affecting in any manner the administration of the estate of any such beneficiary on whose account such benefits are payable or whose estate includes assets derived from benefits paid by the Veterans Affairs, its predecessor or successor. Written notice shall be given by certified mail, return receipt requested, unless waived in writing, to the office of the Veterans Affairs having jurisdiction over the area in which the court is located, of the time and place for hearing on any petition or pleading or in connection with any proceeding pertaining to or affecting in any manner the administration of the estate of any such beneficiary of the Veterans Affairs. Said notice shall be deposited in the mails not less than fifteen (15) days prior to the date of such hearing or other proceedings.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 25, § 1-A; 1974, ch. 315, § 83; 1982, ch. 141, § 116, effective July 1, 1982; 1984, ch. 111, § 156, effective July 13, 1984; 2017 ch. 42, § 21, effective June 29, 2017.

388.210.
When appointment of guardian or conservator to be made under this chapter.

Whenever, pursuant to any law of the United States or regulation of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, it is necessary, prior to payment of benefits, that a guardian or conservator be appointed for a minor or a mentally disabled beneficiary of the Veterans Affairs such appointment shall be made in the manner hereinafter provided.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 25, § 2; 1982, ch. 141, § 117, effective July 1, 1982; 2017 ch. 42, § 22, effective June 29, 2017.

388.220.
Guardian or conservator representing five or more wards not eligible — Exceptions.

Except as hereinafter provided, it shall be unlawful for any person to accept appointment as guardian or conservator of any minor or mentally disabled beneficiary of the Veterans Affairs if such proposed guardian or conservator shall at that time be acting as guardian or conservator for five (5) wards. In any case, upon presentation of a petition by an attorney of the Veterans Affairs under this section alleging that a guardian or conservator is acting in a fiduciary capacity for more than five (5) wards and requesting his discharge for that reason, the court, upon proof substantiating the petition, shall require a final accounting forthwith from such guardian or conservator and shall discharge such guardian or conservator in said case.

The limitations of this section shall not apply where the guardian or conservator is a bank or trust company. An individual may be guardian or conservator of more than five (5) wards if they are all members of the same family.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 25, § 3; 1982, ch. 141, § 118, effective July 1, 1982; 2017 ch. 42, § 23, effective June 29, 2017.

388.230.
Petition for appointment of guardian or conservator — Who to be appointed.

A petition for the appointment of a guardian or conservator for any minor or mentally disabled beneficiary of the Veterans Affairs may be filed in the court having jurisdiction by or on behalf of any person who under existing law is entitled to priority of appointment. If there be no person so entitled or if the person so entitled shall neglect or refuse to file such a petition within thirty (30) days after mailing of notice by the Veterans Affairs to the last known address of such person indicating the necessity for the same, a petition for such appointment may be filed by or on behalf of any responsible person residing in this state.

The petition for appointment shall set forth the name, age, place of residence of such beneficiary, the name and place of residence of the nearest relative, if known, and the fact that such beneficiary is entitled to receive benefits payable by or through the Veterans Affairs and shall set forth the amount of moneys then due and the amount of probable future payments.

The petition shall also set forth the name and address of the person or institution, if any, having actual custody of such beneficiary, and the name, age, relationship, if any, occupation and address of the person proposed for appointment as guardian or conservator. Notwithstanding any provision of existing law as to priority, the court may appoint a capable individual, bank or trust company, as guardian or conservator, if the person entitled to priority fails to apply, or if after hearing the court determines it is for the best interest of such beneficiary to appoint another.

In the case of a mentally disabled beneficiary, the petition shall show that such beneficiary has been rated incompetent by the Veterans Affairs on examination in accordance with the laws and regulations governing the Veterans Affairs.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 25, § 4; 1982, ch. 141, § 119, effective July 1, 1982; 2017 ch. 42, § 24, effective June 29, 2017.

388.240.
Certificate of administrator is prima facie evidence of necessity for guardian.

Where a petition is filed for the appointment of a guardian for a minor beneficiary of the Veterans Affairs, a certificate of the administrator of Veterans Affairs, or his authorized representative, accompanying such petition setting forth the age of such minor as shown by the records of the Veterans Affairs and the fact that the appointment of a guardian is a condition precedent to the payment of any moneys due the minor by the Veterans Affairs, shall be prima facie evidence of the necessity for such appointment.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 25, § 5; 2017 ch. 42, § 25, effective June 29, 2017.

388.250.
Certificate of administrator is prima facie evidence of necessity for guardian or conservator — Guardian ad litem.

Notwithstanding the provisions of existing law for adjudication of mental disability and appointment of a guardian or conservator upon the inquest of a jury, where a petition is filed for the appointment of a guardian or conservator for a mentally disabled beneficiary of the Veterans Affairs under the provisions of this chapter, who is found within this state, whether or not a resident thereof, a certificate of the administrator of Veterans Affairs or his duly authorized representative, accompanying such petition setting forth the fact that such beneficiary has been rated incompetent by the Veterans Affairs on examination in accordance with the laws and regulations governing such Veterans Affairs, and that the appointment of a guardian or conservator is a condition precedent to the payment of any moneys due each beneficiary by the Veterans Affairs, shall be prima facie evidence of the necessity for such appointment. Provided, however, that some member of the bar shall be appointed by the court to represent and protect the interests and rights of such mentally disabled beneficiary as provided under existing law, and further that the right of any such mentally disabled beneficiary or any person interested in such beneficiary to demand a trial by jury shall not be denied.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 25, § 6; 1982, ch. 141, § 120, effective July 1, 1982; 2017 ch. 42, § 26, effective June 29, 2017.

388.260.
Notice of petition for appointment of guardian or conservator.

Upon the filing of a petition for the appointment of a guardian or conservator under the provisions of this chapter, notice shall be given in like manner as is provided under existing law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 25, § 7; 1982, ch. 141, § 143, effective July 1, 1982.

388.270.
Court to approve appointment — Bond of guardian or conservator.

Before making an appointment under the provisions of this chapter, the court shall be satisfied that the person whose appointment is sought is a fit and proper person to be appointed. Upon the appointment being made, the guardian or conservator shall execute and file a bond to be approved by the court in an amount not less than the estimated value of the personal estate and anticipated income during the ensuing year. The said bond shall be in the form and be conditioned as required of guardians and conservators appointed under the general guardianship laws of this state. The court shall have power from time to time to require the guardian or conservator to file an additional bond.

Where a bond is tendered by a guardian or conservator with personal sureties, there shall be at least two (2) such sureties and they shall file with the court a certificate under oath which shall describe the property owned, both real and personal, and shall state that they are each worth the sum named in the bond as the penalty thereof over and above all their debts and liabilities and exclusive of property exempt from execution. Notwithstanding such tender, the court may require additional security or may require a corporate surety bond, the premium thereon to be paid from the ward’s estate.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 25, § 8; 1982, ch. 141, § 121, effective July 1, 1982.

388.280.
Biennial accounting — Notices and information to be given to Department of Veterans Affairs — Hearings.

Every guardian or conservator who shall receive on account of his ward any moneys from the Veterans Affairs, shall file with the court biennially, on the anniversary date of the appointment, in addition to such other accounts as may be required by the court, a full, true and accurate account under oath of all moneys so received by him, of all disbursements thereof, and showing the balance thereof in his hands at the date of such account and how invested. The guardian or conservator, at the time of filing his account shall exhibit all securities or investments described therein to an officer of the bank or other depository wherein said securities are held for safekeeping, or to an authorized representative of the corporation which is surety on his bond, or to the clerk or deputy clerk of a court of record in this state or to any other reputable person designated by the court upon request of the guardian or conservator or other interested party, who shall certify in writing that he has examined such securities or investments and identified them with those described in the account; provided, that if such depository is the guardian or conservator, such certifying officer shall be an officer other than the officer verifying the account, or the guardian or conservator may exhibit such securities or investments to the judge of the court who shall endorse on the account and copy thereof a statement that the securities or investments shown therein as on hand were in fact exhibited to him and that those exhibited to him were the same as those shown in the account. Such certificate, and the certificate of an official of the bank in which is deposited any cash balance showing the amount on deposit shall be filed by the guardian or conservator with his account. A certified copy of each such account and a signed duplicate of such certificates filed with the court shall be sent by the guardian or conservator to the office of the Veterans Affairs having jurisdiction over the area in which such court is located. A duplicate signed copy, or certified copy of any petition, motion or other pleading which is filed in the guardianship proceedings, or in any proceedings for the purpose of removing the disability or minority or of mental incompetency, shall be furnished by the person filing the same, to the office of the Veterans Affairs concerned. The court, unless hearing be waived in writing by the chief attorney of the Veterans Affairs, shall fix a time and place for the hearing on such account, petition, or other pleading, not less than fifteen (15) days nor more than thirty (30) days from the date of filing same unless a different available date be stipulated in writing and written notice of the time and place of such hearing shall be given by the court to the aforesaid Veterans Affairs office not less than fifteen (15) days prior to the date fixed for the hearing. Notice of such hearing shall in like manner be given to the guardian or conservator and to any others entitled to notice.

The clerk shall mail said Veterans Affairs office a copy of each order entered in any guardianship proceeding wherein the Veterans Affairs is an interested party.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 25, § 9; 1982, ch. 141, § 122, effective July 1, 1982; 1986, ch. 10, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 2017 ch. 42, § 27, effective June 29, 2017.

388.290.
Removal for failure to file accounts or furnish documents.

If any guardian or conservator shall fail to file with the court or the Veterans Affairs , as required by this chapter, any account of the benefits received by him from the Veterans Affairs on account of his ward within thirty (30) days after such account is due, or shall fail to furnish the Veterans Affairs a true copy of any account or of any petition or pleading as required by this chapter, such failure shall be grounds for removal.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 25, § 10; 1982, ch. 141, § 123, effective July 1, 1982; 2017 ch. 42, § 28, effective June 29, 2017.

388.300.
Compensation of guardian or conservator.

Compensation payable to guardians or conservators shall not exceed five percent (5%) of the income of the ward during any year, but in no event shall the amount of such compensation be less than fifty dollars ($50) for each year. In the event of extraordinary services rendered by any guardian or conservator, the court may, upon petition and after notice to the Veterans Affairs and hearing thereon, authorize reasonable additional compensation therefor payable from the estate of the ward. Notice of such petition and hearing shall be given to the proper office of the Veterans Affairs in the manner provided in KRS

388.280

. No commission or compensation shall be allowed on the estate received from a preceding guardian.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 25, § 11; 1962, ch. 250; 1982, ch. 141, § 124, effective July 1, 1982; 2017 ch. 42, § 29, effective June 29, 2017.

388.310.
Investment of funds.

All funds in possession of such guardian or conservator shall be invested in such securities or other property in which the guardian or conservator has no interest, as allowed by law which investment shall be first approved by the court; except that investments in direct interest-bearing obligations of the United States government or of this state shall be permissible without an order of the court.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 25, § 12; 1982, ch. 141, § 125, effective July 1, 1982.

388.320.
Support of persons other than ward.

A guardian or conservator shall not apply any portion of the estate of his ward for the support and maintenance of any person other than said ward, his minor children and his spouse (if the spouse and the ward be living together) except upon petition to and prior order of the court after a hearing, notice of which has been given the proper office of the Veterans Affairs in the manner and within the time provided in KRS

388.280

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 25, § 13; 1974, ch. 386, § 72; 1982, ch. 141, § 126, effective July 1, 1982; 2017 ch. 42, § 30, effective June 29, 2017.

388.330.
Certified copies of records to be furnished to applicant or Department of Veterans Affairs without charge.

Whenever a copy of any public record is required by the Veterans Affairs to be used in determining the eligibility of any person to participate in benefits made available by such Veterans Affairs, the official charged with the custody of such public record shall without charge provide the applicant for such benefits or any person acting on his behalf or the authorized representative of such Veterans Affairs with a certified copy of such record.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 25, § 14; 2017 ch. 42, § 31, effective June 29, 2017.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The individual beneficiary or the representative may request the copies needed to prove eligibility without any further substantiation.

OAG 63-745

.

This section requires the court clerk to provide copies of records maintained in his custody free of charge to a person only if the records are needed in connection with a claim filed with the Veterans Administration; otherwise, the person must not only pay for copies of records in custody of the clerk which are not needed in connection with a claim filed with the Veterans Administration, but also must pay for copies of records he brings to the clerk solely for the purpose of copying regardless of whether they are needed in connection with a claim filed with the Veterans Administration.

OAG 84-145

.

388.340.
Termination of guardianship or conservatorship.

Upon filing a petition, or certificate, showing that a minor ward has attained majority, or that a mentally disabled ward has been rated competent upon examination in accordance with the law, the court may order the guardian or conservator to file a final account; and, upon hearing, after notice to the former minor or mentally disabled person and to the Veterans Affairs in the manner and within the time provided by KRS

388.280

, and upon approval of the final account, the court may so adjudge and discharge the guardian or conservator and release the sureties from liability upon delivery to the former ward of the assets due him by the former guardian or conservator, and may make such further order as may be lawful.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 25, § 15; 1982, ch. 141, § 127, effective July 1, 1982; 2017 ch. 42, § 32, effective June 29, 2017.

388.350.
Commitment or transfer of mentally disabled person to custody of Department of Veterans Affairs or other federal agency.

Whenever in a proceeding for the trial and commitment of any person who appears to be mentally disabled it is determined that such person is either an individual with an intellectual disability, an epileptic, or a mentally ill person and ought to be committed for safekeeping or treatment and it appears that such person is eligible for care or treatment by the Veterans Affairs or other agency of the United States government, the court of the county in which such person is found, having jurisdiction in such matters, upon receipt of a certificate from the Veterans Affairs or such other agency showing that facilities are available and that such person is eligible for care or treatment therein, may commit such person to the Veterans Affairs or other agency of the United States government for care or treatment. Thereafter, such person, upon admission to any such facility, shall be subject to the rules and regulations of the Veterans Affairs or other agency of the United States government. The chief officer of any such facility or institution to which such person is committed under the provisions of this section shall be vested with the same powers as are exercised by superintendents of state hospitals for mental diseases within this state with respect to the retention, transfer, parole or discharge of the person so committed. Notice of such pending commitment proceedings shall be furnished the person whose commitment is sought and his right to appear and defend shall not be denied. The judgment or order of commitment by a court of competent jurisdiction of another state committing a person to the Veterans Affairs or other agency of the United States government, for care or treatment, shall have the same force and effect as to such person while in this state as in the state in which is situated the court entering such judgment or making such order.

Upon receipt of a certificate of the Veterans Affairs or such other agency of the United States government that facilities are available for the care or treatment of any person heretofore committed to any hospital for the mentally ill or other institution in this state for the care of persons similarly disabled and that such person is eligible for such care or treatment, the superintendent of any such hospital or institution in this state is hereby authorized to cause the transfer of any such person to the Veterans Affairs or other agency of the United States government for care or treatment. Upon effecting any such transfer, the committing court shall be notified thereof by the transferring agency; provided, however, that no person shall be transferred if he be confined pursuant to conviction of any crime or misdemeanor, or if he shall have been acquitted of any such charge solely on the ground of insanity, unless prior to such transfer the court originally committing such person shall enter an order for such transfer after appropriate motion and hearing.

Any person transferred as provided in this section shall be deemed to be committed to the Veterans Affairs or other agency of the United States government pursuant to the original commitment the same as if he had been originally so committed.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 25, § 16; 1978, ch. 92, § 11, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 141, § 144, effective July 1, 1982; 2012, ch. 146, § 115, effective July 12, 2012; 2017 ch. 42, § 33, effective June 29, 2017.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Hospital care or treatment by agency of United States,
KRS

202A.221

.

388.360.
Construction and application of chapter.

This chapter shall be construed liberally to secure the beneficial intents and purposes thereof and shall apply only to beneficiaries of the Veterans Affairs.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 25, § 17; 2017 ch. 42, § 34, effective June 29, 2017.

388.370.
Title of chapter.

This chapter may be cited as the “Uniform Veterans’ Guardianship Act.”

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 25, § 18.

388.380.
Application of other laws.

All laws or parts of laws relating to beneficiaries of the Veterans Affairs inconsistent with this chapter are hereby repealed. Except where inconsistent with this chapter, the general guardianship laws of this state and the laws establishing the practice in such matters including rights of appeal, shall be applicable to such beneficiaries and their estates.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 25, § 20; 2017 ch. 42, § 35, effective June 29, 2017.

388.390.
Chapter governs estates of beneficiaries of Department of Veterans Affairs.

The provisions of this chapter relating to surety bonds and the administration of estates of Veterans Affairs beneficiaries under guardianship shall apply to all such estates heretofore or hereafter created under the general laws of this state to the extent that such estates have assets derived from benefits paid by the Veterans Affairs or receive such benefits in the future.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 25, § 21; 2017 ch. 42, § 36, effective June 29, 2017.